Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1009
Abandonment; cruel neglect; harassment of a police animal; penalty.

(1) A person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly abandons or cruelly neglects an animal is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor unless the abandonment or cruel neglect results in serious injury or illness or death of the animal, in which case it is a Class IV felony.

(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, a person who cruelly mistreats an animal is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class IIIA felony for any subsequent offense.

(b) A person who cruelly mistreats an animal is guilty of a Class IIIA felony if such cruel mistreatment involves the knowing and intentional torture, repeated beating, or mutilation of the animal.

(3) A person commits harassment of a police animal if he or she knowingly and intentionally teases or harasses a police animal in order to distract, agitate, or harm the police animal for the purpose of preventing such animal from performing its legitimate official duties. Harassment of a police animal is a Class IV misdemeanor unless the harassment is the proximate cause of the death of the police animal, in which case it is a Class IIIA felony.

(4) A person convicted of a Class I misdemeanor under this section may also be subject to section 28-1019. A person convicted of a felony under this section shall also be subject to section 28-1019.

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 283, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 82, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 273, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB227, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB329, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB674, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 49;

Laws 2022, LB829, § 1.

Under section 28-1019, if a person is convicted of a Class IV felony under this section, the sentencing court shall order such person not to own, possess, or reside with any animal for at least 5 years and no more than 15 years after the date of conviction. State v. Meduna, 18 Neb. App. 818, 794 N.W.2d 160 (2011).

Under subsection (1) of this section, a person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly abandons or cruelly neglects an animal is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor, unless the abandonment or cruel neglect results in serious injury or illness or death of the animal, in which case it is a Class IV felony. State v. Meduna, 18 Neb. App. 818, 794 N.W.2d 160 (2011).